Utah statutes.
53B-1-106.   Appointment and hiring of staff -- Transfer of functions, personnel, and funds.

Upon the commissioner's recommendation, the board appoints and hires a staff of professional and administrative personnel to serve at its pleasure.  Salaries, retirement provisions, other benefits, and capacities of service are determined by the board.  If the board transfers a staff function from an institution's own staff, the funds budgeted by the institution for the transferred functions are transferred to the board. Transferred personnel retain their retirement and other benefits and seniority of term standing with the institution from which they are transferred.

